New Jersey, session 221, A3871.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. The State Board of Education shall adopt New Jersey Student Learning Standards in Social Studies on Latino and Hispanic history. b. A board of education shall include instruction on the history and contributions of Latinos and Hispanics in an appropriate place in the curriculum of students in grades kindergarten through 12 as part of the school district's implementation of the New Jersey Student Learning Standards in Social Studies. The instruction shall be historically accurate, culturally relevant, community-based, contemporary, and developmentally appropriate. c. The Commissioner of Education, in consultation with the Commission on Latino and Hispanic Heritage established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2019, c.321 (C.18A:4-48), shall provide school districts with sample learning activities and resources that may be used to support implementation of the instructional requirement. 2.   This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year following the date of enactment.  The standards adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall occur concurrent with each update to the New Jersey Student Learning Standards required pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-46).